Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1340.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 39-101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE39-101. Permanent public records; quality; storage; compliant digital copy; violation; classification A. Permanent public records of the this state, a county, city or town, or other another political subdivision of the this state,  shall be transcribed or kept on paper, a digital medium or other another material which that is of durable or permanent quality and which that conforms to standards established by the director of the Arizona state library, archives and public records.  Any digital medium that conforms to the standards established by the director of the Arizona state library, archives and public records is considered of durable or permanent quality. B. Permanent public records that are transcribed or kept as provided in subsection A of this section shall be stored and maintained according to standards for the storage of permanent public records established by the director of the Arizona state library, archives and public records. C. A public officer who is charged with transcribing or keeping public records pursuant to this section may destroy a public record that is on paper or another material only after creating a compliant digital public record that receives proper certification and after completing any required notification procedures. C. D. A public officer who is charged with transcribing or keeping such public records pursuant to this section and who violates this section is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE